epihan/data/hanzi-ipa.xfst
echo >> Clearing stack
clear stack

define Tones [0|1|2|3|4|5] ;
define PhoneticVowels [a|e|i|o|u|ə] ;
define Alveopalatals [j|q|x|y] ;
define Labials [b|p|m|f] ;

echo >> Defining rules
! Pinyin to Phonemic Pinyin
define Digraphs [ [ z h ] -> %+zh, [ c h ] -> %+ch, [ s h ] -> %+sh, [ n g ] -> %+ng ] ;
define SpecialDiphthongs1 [ [ i u ] -> [ i o u ], [ a o ] -> [ a u ] ] ;
define HighFrontRoundedV [ u -> v || Alveopalatals _ ] ;
define RimeRhotics [ e r -> a r || _ Tones ] ;
define DelOnsetW [ w -> 0 || _ u ] ;
define DelOnsetY [ y -> 0 || _ [u|i|v] ] ;
define SpecialDiphthongs2 [ o -> {uo} || Labials _ ] ;
define Pinyin2Phonemic Digraphs
       .o. SpecialDiphthongs1
       .o. HighFrontRoundedV
       .o. RimeRhotics
       .o. DelOnsetW
       .o. DelOnsetY
       .o. SpecialDiphthongs2
       ;

! Phonemic Pinyin to IPA
define OnsPlosive [ b -> p, d -> t, g -> k, p -> pʰ, t -> tʰ, k -> kʰ || [ .#. | Tones ] _ ] ;
define OnsAffricate [ z -> t͡s, %+zh -> t͡ʂ, j -> t͡ɕ, c -> t͡sʰ, %+ch -> t͡ʂʰ, q -> t͡ɕʰ ] ;
define OnsFricative [ f -> f, s -> s, %+sh -> ʂ, x -> ɕ, h -> x ] ;
define OnsY1 [ y -> ɥ || _ [u|v] ] ;
define OnsY2 [ y -> j ] ;
define Nuclei [ e -> ə || _ [ .#. | n | %+ng ] ] .o. [ v -> y ] ;
define Codas [ i -> j, u -> w, %+ng -> ŋ || PhoneticVowels _ Tones ] ;
define Rhotics [ r -> ɻ ] ;
define Tones1 [ Tones -> 0 || _ .#. ] ;
define Tones2 [ Tones -> "," ] ;
define Phonemic2IPA OnsPlosive
       .o. OnsAffricate
       .o. OnsFricative
       .o. OnsY1
       .o. OnsY2
       .o. Nuclei
       .o. Codas
       .o. Rhotics
       .o. Tones1
       .o. Tones2
        ;

define Pinyin2IPA Pinyin2Phonemic .o. Phonemic2IPA ;

echo >> Reading lexicon (Hanzi2Pinyin)
read lexc < cedict-lexc.txt
define Hanzi2Pinyin

echo >> Clearing stack
clear stack

echo >> Defining regex (with Kleene closure)
read regex Hanzi2Pinyin .o. Pinyin2IPA ;
echo >> Saving stack
save stack hanzi-ipa.fst
echo >> Done!
